North Carolina, session 2025, SB174.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-9, 115D-15.1, and 143-341(3) or any
other provision of law, Rutherford County (hereinafter "County") is hereby authorized to
construct community college buildings, as that term is defined in G.S. 143-336, on the campuses
of Isothermal Community College (hereinafter "College") located within the County. For
purposes of this act, the terms "construct" and "construction" include making additions,
improvements, renovations, or repairs to all or any part of a community college building. The
County may finance the construction of these buildings in accordance with Article 8 of Chapter
159 of the General Statutes and G.S. 160A-20. If the County finances the construction of any
building on the College's campuses, the College Board of Trustees may, in connection with the
construction, transfer any of its property to the County to be used as security for the financing
agreement. The County shall transfer the property back to the College Board of Trustees when
any financing agreement entered into by the County to finance the construction, including any
additions, improvements, renovations, and repairs, has been satisfied. The County may also
construct the community college buildings using other funding sources, including appropriations
made by the General Assembly. Upon the completion of the construction of the buildings, the
County shall lease the buildings to the College under the terms and conditions agreed to by both
the County and College.
SECTION 1.(b) In constructing buildings as authorized by this act, the County does
not have to comply with the provisions of G.S. 115D-9 or Part 1 of Article 36 of Chapter 143 of
the General Statutes. However, the County shall comply with the provisions of Article 3D of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. The
County shall consult with the College Board of Trustees about programming requirements for
the buildings and shall keep the Board informed as to the construction process and progress.
SECTION 1.(c) The County and College Board of Trustees may enter into a
memorandum of understanding to allow for the construction of community college buildings by
the County on the campuses of the College located within the County if deemed appropriate by
the County and College and if the terms of the memorandum will allow for the construction to
be completed in a timely fashion and cost-efficient manner.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies only to
construction projects, including additions, improvements, renovations, and repairs, coordinated
by the County for College uses and purposes.
*S174-v-1*